Illinois, session 104th, HB4358.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 14-30, 16-55, and 16-115 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/14-30)7    Sec. 14-30. Hearings on revisions or corrections; public 8records. In all counties, all hearings held by the chief 9county assessment officer in support of or in opposition to a 10proposed revision or correction in assessed valuation shall be 11open to the public. All files maintained by the chief county 12assessment officer relating to the assessed valuation of any 13property, and all complaints, supporting documents, and other 14evidence submitted by the complainant shall be available for 15public inspection during regular office hours of the chief 16county assessment officer.17    Beginning with the 2027 assessment year, in counties with 183,000,000 or more inhabitants, if the owner and occupant of 19property containing a single family residence wishes to 20support a request for a revision or correction of the 21valuation of the property by facts set forth in an appraisal 22report of the property prepared by an Illinois Certified Real 23Estate Appraiser in conformance with the Uniform Standards of   HB4358- 2 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1Professional Appraisal Practice as currently adopted by the 2Appraisal Standards Board, the property owner shall submit the 3appraisal to the chief county assessment officer. The 4submitted appraisal must be prepared for ad valorem purposes, 5estimate the value of the property as of January 1 of the 6assessment year at issue, and comply with all rules of the 7chief county assessment officer concerning the submission of 8appraisals. If the chief county assessment officer renders a 9decision lowering the assessed valuation of the property, the 10county shall reimburse the property owner for the cost of the 11appraisal. 12    If a property owner wishes to support his or her request 13for a revision or correction of valuation by facts set forth in 14income tax returns, he or she shall submit the entire return to 15the chief county assessment officer. However, only the 16portions of the return relating to the property for which a 17revision or correction is requested shall be a public record. 18If requested by the chief county assessment officer, the 19property owner shall execute a consent in favor of the chief 20county assessment officer instructing the taxing body with 21which the income tax return was filed to furnish a certified 22copy of the return so that the accuracy of the copy submitted 23to the chief county assessment officer may be verified.24    The chief county assessment officer shall promptly furnish 25to any person copies of all complaints, supporting documents 26and other evidence submitted by a complainant, subject to the   HB4358- 3 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1foregoing qualification, and all public records of the chief 2county assessment officer for a fee of 35 cents per page of 3legal size or smaller and $1 for each larger page.4(Source: P.A. 77-1709; 88-455.) 5    (35 ILCS 200/16-55)6    Sec. 16-55. Complaints. 7    (a) On written complaint that any property is overassessed 8or underassessed, the board shall review the assessment, and 9correct it, as appears to be just, but in no case shall the 10property be assessed at a higher percentage of fair cash value 11than other property in the assessment district prior to 12equalization by the board or the Department. 13    (b) The board shall include compulsory sales in reviewing 14and correcting assessments, including, but not limited to, 15those compulsory sales submitted by the complainant, if the 16board determines that those sales reflect the same property 17characteristics and condition as those originally used to make 18the assessment. The board shall also consider whether the 19compulsory sale would otherwise be considered an arm's length 20transaction. 21    (c) If a complaint is filed by an attorney on behalf of a 22complainant, all notices and correspondence from the board 23relating to the appeal shall be directed to the attorney. The 24board may require proof of the attorney's authority to 25represent the taxpayer. If the attorney fails to provide proof   HB4358- 4 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1of authority within the compliance period granted by the board 2pursuant to subsection (d), the board may dismiss the 3complaint. The Board shall send, electronically or by mail, 4notice of the dismissal to the attorney and complainant. 5    (d) A complaint to affect the assessment for the current 6year shall be filed on or before 30 calendar days after the 7date of publication of the assessment list under Section 812-10. Beginning with the 2027 assessment year, if the 9complainant is the owner and occupant of property containing a 10single family residence and wishes to support the complaint 11that the property is overassessed by facts set forth in an 12appraisal report of the property prepared by an Illinois 13Certified Real Estate Appraiser in conformance with the 14Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice as 15currently adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board, the 16property owner shall submit the appraisal to the board of 17review. The submitted appraisal must be prepared for ad 18valorem purposes, estimate the value of the property as of 19January 1 of the assessment year at issue, and comply with all 20rules of the board of review concerning the submission of 21appraisals. If the board of review renders a decision lowering 22the assessed valuation of the property, the county shall 23reimburse the complainant for the cost of the appraisal. Upon 24receipt of a written complaint that is timely filed under this 25Section, the board of review shall docket the complaint. If 26the complaint does not comply with the board of review rules   HB4358- 5 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1adopted under Section 9-5 entitling the complainant to a 2hearing, the board shall send, electronically or by mail, 3notification acknowledging receipt of the complaint. The 4notification must identify which rules have not been complied 5with and provide the complainant with not less than 10 6business days to bring the complaint into compliance with 7those rules. If the complainant complies with the board of 8review rules either upon the initial filing of a complaint or 9within the time as extended by the board of review for 10compliance, then the board of review shall send, 11electronically or by mail, a notice of hearing and the board 12shall hear the complaint and shall issue and send, 13electronically or by mail, a decision upon resolution. Except 14as otherwise provided in subsection (c), if the complainant 15has not complied with the rules within the time as extended by 16the board of review, the board shall nonetheless issue and 17send a decision. The board of review may adopt rules allowing 18any party to attend and participate in a hearing by telephone 19or electronically. 20    (d-5) Complaints and other written correspondence sent by 21the United States mail shall be considered filed as of the 22postmark date in accordance with Section 1.25 of the Statute 23on Statutes. Complaints and other written correspondence sent 24by a delivery service other than the United States Postal 25System shall be considered as filed as of the date sent as 26indicated by the shipper's tracking label. If allowed by board   HB4358- 6 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1of review rule, complaints and other written correspondence 2transmitted electronically shall be considered filed as of the 3date received. 4    (e) The board may also, at any time before its revision of 5the assessments is completed in every year, increase, reduce 6or otherwise adjust the assessment of any property, making 7changes in the valuation as may be just, and shall have full 8power over the assessment of any person and may do anything in 9regard thereto that it may deem necessary to make a just 10assessment, but the property shall not be assessed at a higher 11percentage of fair cash value than the assessed valuation of 12other property in the assessment district prior to 13equalization by the board or the Department. 14    (f) No assessment shall be increased until the person to 15be affected has been notified and given an opportunity to be 16heard, except as provided below. 17    (g) Before making any reduction in assessments of its own 18motion, the board of review shall give notice to the assessor 19or chief county assessment officer who certified the 20assessment, and give the assessor or chief county assessment 21officer an opportunity to be heard thereon. 22    (h) All complaints of errors in assessments of property 23shall be in writing, and shall be filed by the complaining 24party with the board of review, in the number of copies 25required by board of review rule. A copy shall be filed by the 26board of review with the assessor or chief county assessment   HB4358- 7 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1officer who certified the assessment. 2    (i) In all cases where a change in assessed valuation of 3$100,000 or more is sought, the board of review shall also 4serve a copy of the petition on all taxing districts as shown 5on the last available tax bill at least 14 days prior to the 6hearing on the complaint. Service may be by electronic means 7if the taxing district consents to electronic service and 8provides the board of review with a valid e-mail address for 9the purpose of receiving service. All taxing districts shall 10have an opportunity to be heard on the complaint. A taxing 11district wishing to intervene shall file a request to 12intervene with the board of review at least five days in 13advance of a scheduled hearing. If board of review rules 14require the appellant to submit evidence in advance of a 15hearing, then any evidence in support of the intervenor's 16opinion of assessed value must be submitted to the board of 17review and complainant no later than five calendar days prior 18to the hearing. Service shall be made as set forth in 19subsection (d-5), but if board of review rules allow 20complaints and correspondence to be transmitted 21electronically, then the intervenor's evidence shall be 22transmitted electronically. 23    (i-5) If board of review rules require the appellant to 24submit evidence in advance of a hearing, then any evidence to 25support the assessor's opinion of assessed value must be 26submitted to the board of review and the complainant (or, if   HB4358- 8 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1represented by an attorney, to the attorney) no later than 2five calendar days prior to the hearing. Service shall be made 3as set forth in subsection (d-5), but if board of review rules 4allow complaints and correspondence to be transmitted 5electronically, then the assessor's evidence shall be 6transmitted electronically. 7    (j) Complaints shall be classified by townships or taxing 8districts by the clerk of the board of review. All classes of 9complaints shall be docketed numerically, each in its own 10class, in the order in which they are presented, in books kept 11for that purpose, which books shall be open to public 12inspection. Complaints shall be considered by townships or 13taxing districts until all complaints have been heard and 14passed upon by the board.15(Source: P.A. 98-322, eff. 8-12-13; 99-98, eff. 1-1-16; 1699-579, eff. 7-15-16.) 17    (35 ILCS 200/16-115)18    Sec. 16-115. Filing complaints. In counties with 3,000,000 19or more inhabitants, complaints that any property is 20overassessed or underassessed or is exempt may be made by any 21taxpayer. Complaints that any property is overassessed or 22underassessed or is exempt may be made by a taxing district 23that has an interest in the assessment to a board of review. 24All complaints shall be in writing, identify and describe the 25particular property, otherwise comply with the rules in force,   HB4358- 9 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1be either signed by the complaining party or his or her 2attorney or, if filed electronically, signed with the 3electronic signature of the complaining party or his or her 4attorney, and be filed with the board of appeals (until the 5first Monday in December 1998 and the board of review 6beginning the first Monday in December 1998 and thereafter) in 7at least duplicate. The board shall forward one copy of each 8complaint to the county assessor. Beginning with the 2027 9assessment year, if the complainant is the owner and occupant 10of property containing a single family residence and wishes to 11support the complaint that the property is overassessed by 12facts set forth in an appraisal report of the property 13prepared by an Illinois Certified Real Estate Appraiser in 14conformance with the Uniform Standards of Professional 15Appraisal and Practice as currently adopted by the Appraisal 16Standards Board, the property owner shall submit the appraisal 17to the board of review. The submitted appraisal must be 18prepared for ad valorem purposes, estimate the value the 19property as of January 1 of the assessment year at issue, and 20comply with all rules of the board of review concerning the 21submission of appraisals. If the board of review renders a 22decision lowering the assessed valuation of the property, the 23county shall reimburse the complainant for the cost of the 24appraisal. 25    Complaints by taxpayers and taxing districts and 26certificates of correction by the county assessor as provided   HB4358- 10 -LRB104 16884 HLH 30295 b1in this Code shall be filed with the board according to 2townships on or before the dates specified in the notices 3given in Section 16-110.4(Source: P.A. 97-1054, eff. 1-1-13.)